test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s54_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - bera: # 
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    bera+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ber
    bera+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bar
    bera+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bóru
    bera+V+Sup: borið
